Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 1 Inmate Policies

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 379, § 24/HB 1059, designated Code Sections 42-1-1 through 42-1-11 as Article 1 of this chapter.

Law reviews.

For article on 2006 amendment of this article, see 23 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 11 (2006).

For note, “Give It to Me, I’m Worth It:
The Need to Amend Georgia’s Record Restriction Statute to Provide Ex-Offenders with a Second Chance in the Employment Sector,” see 52 Ga. L. Rev. 267 (2017).

42-1-1.
Definitions.

Except as specifically provided otherwise, as used in this title, the term:

“Board” means the Board of Corrections.

“Case plan” means an individualized accountability and behavior change strategy for a probationer, as applicable.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of corrections.

“Criminal risk factors” means characteristics and behaviors that affect a person’s risk for committing future crimes and include, but are not limited to, antisocial behavior, antisocial personality, criminal thinking, criminal associates, having a dysfunctional family, having low levels of employment or education, poor use of leisure and recreation time, and substance abuse.

“Department” means the Department of Corrections.

“Graduated sanctions” means:

Verbal and written warnings;

Increased restrictions and reporting requirements;

Community service or work crews;

Referral to substance abuse or mental health treatment or counseling programs in the community;

Increased substance abuse screening and monitoring;

Electronic monitoring, as such term is defined in Code Section 42-3-111; and

An intensive supervision program.

“Risk and needs assessment” means an actuarial tool, approved by the board and validated on a targeted population, scientifically proven to determine a person’s risk to recidivate and to identify criminal risk factors that, when properly addressed, can reduce that person’s likelihood of committing future criminal behavior.

History.

Ga. L. 1921, p. 243, §§ 3, 5; Code 1933, §§ 27-504, 27-9903; Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 7-1/HB 1176; Ga. L. 2013, p. 222, § 17/HB 349; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-62/HB 310.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “(a) No employee of a penal institution may give advice to an inmate regarding the name or the employment of an attorney at law in any case where the inmate is confined in a penal institution or receive any sum of money paid as fees or otherwise to attorneys at law in a criminal case or cases against any inmate with which they may be connected in any capacity.

“(b) Any person who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.” See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, deleted former paragraph (1), which read: “ ‘Active supervision’ means the period of a probated sentence in which a probationer actively reports to his or her probation supervisor or is otherwise under the direct supervision of a probation supervisor.”; deleted former paragraph (2), which read: “ ‘Administrative supervision’ means the period of probation supervision that has reduced supervision and reporting requirements commensurate with and that follows active supervision but that is prior to the termination of a sentence.”; and redesignated former paragraphs (3) through (9) as present paragraphs (1) through (7), respectively. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “42-3-111” for “42-8-151” in subparagraph (6)(F). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Cross references.

Solicitation on behalf of attorneys generally, §

15-19-55

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 9-1(a)/HB 1176, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2012, and shall apply to offenses which occur on or after that date.
Any offense occurring before July 1, 2012, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior conviction for the purpose of imposing a sentence that provides for a different penalty for a subsequent conviction for the same type of offense, of whatever degree or level, pursuant to this Act.”

Ga. L. 2013, p. 222, § 21/HB 349, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2013, and shall apply to offenses which occur on or after that date. Any offense occurring before July 1, 2013, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 amendment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 290 (2012).

For article, “Appeal and Error: Appeal or Certiorari by State in Criminal Cases,” see 30 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 17 (2013).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-1-2.
Reward for information leading to capture of escaped inmate of penal institution under jurisdiction of Board of Corrections.

Any person, other than a law enforcement officer, who furnishes information leading to the capture of an escaped inmate from a penal institution under the jurisdiction of the Board of Corrections may receive a reward of up to $200.00 which shall be payable at the time the escaped inmate is returned to the custody of the Board of Corrections. The commissioner of corrections, at his discretion, may pay the reward to any person from funds appropriated or otherwise available to the Department of Corrections.

When more than one person furnishes information which would entitle them to receive the rewards pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, the reward shall be paid to the first person furnishing the information; and, if more than one person furnishes the information at the same time, the reward shall be prorated among all persons furnishing such information.

History.

Code 1933, § 27-101.3, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 574, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 42; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 42; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1.

Cross references.

Criminal penalties relating to escape of persons from lawful custody, §§

16-10-52

and

16-10-53

.

Reward for detection or apprehension of person committing felony, for information leading to identification of person who murders law enforcement officer, §§ 45-12-35 through 45-12-37.

42-1-3.
Defendant sentenced to death or life imprisonment not to be made trusty during time case on appeal; manner of confinement of defendant.

Any defendant who has been convicted of a felony and sentenced to death or life imprisonment shall not be made a trusty at any penal institution or facility in this state during the time that his case is on appeal. The defendant shall be confined in the same manner as other prisoners.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1429, § 2.

Cross references.

Death penalty generally, §

17-10-30

et seq.

42-1-4.
Work-release programs for county prisoners.

Any person sentenced to confinement as a county prisoner under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 17-10-3 or otherwise sentenced to confinement as a county prisoner may, if there is reasonable cause to believe that he will honor his trust, be allowed to participate in a work-release program as authorized by this Code section. Participation in a work-release program shall be voluntary on the part of the inmate.

When an inmate receives permission to participate in a work-release program, the limits of the place of the confinement of the inmate shall be expanded by allowing the inmate under prescribed conditions to work at paid employment or participate in a training program in the community while continuing as an inmate of the institution to which he is committed. The willful failure of an inmate to remain within the extended limits of his confinement or to return within the prescribed time to the institution shall constitute an escape from the institution and shall be punished as provided in Code Section 16-10-52.

If there is reasonable cause to believe that an inmate will honor his trust, the inmate may be authorized to participate in a work-release program by:

The sentencing judge at the time of sentencing; or

The sheriff, warden, or other official in charge of the institution to which the inmate is committed if written approval is obtained from the sentencing judge.

An inmate authorized to participate in a work-release program under this Code section shall comply with all rules and regulations promulgated by the institution in which he is confined relative to the handling, disbursement, and holding in trust of all funds earned by the inmate while under the jurisdiction of the institution. An amount determined to be the cost of the inmate’s keep and confinement shall be deducted from the earnings of each inmate, and such amount shall be deposited in the treasury of the county. After deduction for keep and confinement the official in charge of the institution shall:

Allow the inmate to draw from the balance a reasonable sum to cover his incidental expenses;

Retain to the inmate’s credit an amount as deemed necessary to accumulate a reasonable sum to be paid to him on his release from the institution; and

Cause to be paid any additional balance as is needed for the support of the inmate’s dependents.

No inmate participating in a work-release program under this Code section shall be deemed to be an agent, employee, or involuntary servant of the county while working or participating in training or going to and from his place of employment or training.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-1-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1259, § 1.

Cross references.

Work-release, educational, and habilitative programs for county prisoners, §

42-1-9

.

Editor’s notes.

Both Ga. L. 1985, p. 1259, § 1 and Ga. L. 1985, p. 1483, § 1 enacted a Code Section 42-1-4. The former has been set out as Code Section 42-1-4 and the latter as Code Section 42-1-5.

42-1-5.
Use of inmate for private gain.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Custodian” means a warden, sheriff, jailer, deputy sheriff, police officer, or any other law enforcement officer having actual custody of an inmate.

“Inmate” means any person who is lawfully incarcerated in a penal institution.

“Penal institution” means any place of confinement for persons accused of or convicted of violating a law of this state or an ordinance of a political subdivision of this state.

It shall be unlawful for a custodian of an inmate of a penal institution to use such inmate or allow such inmate to be used for any purpose resulting in private gain to any individual.

Any person who violates subsection (b) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

This Code section shall not apply to:

Work on private property because of natural disasters;

(1.1)

Work on private property as a form of victim compensation in accordance with Chapter 15A of Title 17;

Work or other programs or releases which have the prior approval of the board or commissioner of corrections;

Community service work programs;

Work-release programs; or

Work programs authorized by Article 6 of Chapter 5 of this title.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-1-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1483, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 42; Ga. L. 2003, p. 252, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1222, § 3/HB 58.

Code Commission notes.

Both Ga. L. 1985, p. 1259 and Ga. L. 1985, p. 1483 enacted a Code Section 42-1-4. Additionally, Ga. L. 1985, p. 1483 contained “board or commissioner of offender rehabilitation” in paragraph (2) of subsection (d). Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, this Code section has been renumbered Code Section 42-1-5 and “offender rehabilitation” changed to “corrections.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 1222, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Working Against Recidivism Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2005, p. 1222, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) Many persons sentenced to confinement for criminal offenses commit additional criminal offenses after release from confinement, and such recidivism is a serious danger to public safety and a major source of expense to the state;

“(2) Under the appropriate conditions and limitations, work programs of voluntary labor by inmates of state and county correctional institutions for privately owned profit-making employers to produce goods, services, or goods and services for sale to public or private purchasers provide substantial public benefits by:

“(A) Providing job experience and skills to participating inmates;

“(B) Allowing participating inmates to accumulate savings available for their use when released from the correctional institution;

“(C) Lowering recidivism rates;

“(D) Generating taxes from inmate income;

“(E) Reducing the cost of incarceration by enabling participating inmates to pay room and board; and

“(F) Providing participating inmates income to pay fines, restitution, and family support;

“(3)
Appropriate conditions and limitations for voluntary labor by inmates for such work programs include but are not limited to:

“(A) Assurance that inmates’ work is voluntary;

“(B) Payment of inmates at wages at a rate not less than that paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the work is to be performed;

“(C) Provision of federal and state governmental benefits to participating inmates comparable to governmental benefits provided for similarly situated private sector workers;

“(D) Selection of participating inmates with careful attention to security issues;

“(E) Appropriate supervision of inmates during travel or employment outside the correctional institution;

“(F) Assurance that inmate labor will not result in the displacement of employed workers; be applied in skills, crafts, or trades in which there is a surplus of available gainful labor in the locality; or impair existing contracts for services;

“(G) Consultations with local private employers that may be economically impacted; and

“(H) Consultations with local labor union organizations and other local employee groups, especially those who have an interest in the trade or skill to be performed by the inmates; and

“(4)
Requirements for the federal Prison Industry Enhancement Certification Program authorized by 18 U.S.C. Section 1761 and federal regulations are sufficient to ensure appropriate conditions and limitations in many areas of concern for programs of voluntary labor by inmates for privately owned profit-making employers to produce goods, services, or goods and services for sale to public and private purchasers.”

42-1-6.
Injury or contact by inmate presenting possible threat of transmission of communicable disease.

If any inmate of any state or county correctional institution, county or municipal jail, or other similar facility, while such inmate is in custody or in the process of being taken into custody, injures or has injured or contacts or has contacted a law enforcement officer, correctional officer, firefighter, emergency medical technician, or other person in such a manner as to present a possible threat of transmission of a communicable disease to the person so injured or contacted, then the warden, jailer, or other official having charge of such inmate may take all reasonable steps to determine whether the inmate has a communicable disease capable of being transmitted by the injury or contact involved. Such steps may include, but shall not be limited to, any appropriate medical examination of or collection of medical specimens from the inmate. In the event an inmate refuses to cooperate in any such procedures, the warden, jailer, or other official may apply to the superior court of the county for an order authorizing the use of any degree of force reasonably necessary to complete such procedures. Upon a showing of probable cause that the injury presents the threat of transmission of a communicable disease, the court shall issue an order authorizing the petitioner to use reasonable measures to perform any medical procedures reasonably necessary to ascertain whether a communicable disease has been transmitted. In addition to any other grounds sufficient to show probable cause for the issuance of such an order, such probable cause may be conclusively established by evidence of the injury or contact in question and a statement by a licensed physician that the nature of the injury or contact is such as to present a threat of transmission of a communicable disease if the inmate has such a disease. The cost of any procedures carried out under this Code section shall be borne by the jurisdiction having custody of the inmate.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-1-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 1446, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 660, § 4; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1259, § 11.

42-1-7.
Notification to transporting law enforcement agency of inmate’s or patient’s infectious or communicable disease.

For the purposes of this Code section, the term “infectious or communicable disease” shall include infectious hepatitis, tuberculosis, influenza, measles, chicken pox, meningitis, HIV as defined in Code Section 31-22-9.1, or any sexually transmitted disease enumerated in Code Section 31-17-1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any state or county correctional institution, municipal or county detention facility, or any facility as defined in Code Section 37-3-1 shall notify any state or local law enforcement agency required to transport an inmate or patient if such inmate or patient has been diagnosed as having an infectious or communicable disease. Notification shall be limited to the fact that such inmate or patient has an infectious or communicable disease and whether such disease is airborne or transmissible by blood or other body fluids; provided, however, that the specific disease shall not be disclosed. The Department of Public Health shall provide a guide for appropriate precautions to be taken by any person or persons transporting such inmate or patient and shall develop a form to be used for the purpose of ensuring that such precautions are taken.

Information released or obtained pursuant to this Code section shall be privileged and confidential and shall only be released or obtained by the institutions, facilities, or agencies who are parties to the transportation of the patient or inmate. Any person making an unauthorized disclosure of such information shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-1-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1319, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214; Ga. L. 2020, p. 55, § 8/SB 372.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “sexually transmitted” for “venereal” in subsection (a).

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 1991, p. 1319, § 1, Ga. L. 1991, p. 1348, § 1, and Ga. L. 1991, p. 1352, § 1, all purport to enact Code Section 42-1-7.
Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, Ga. L. 1991, p. 1348, § 1, has been renumbered as Code Section 42-1-8 and Ga. L. 1991, p. 1352, § 1, has been renumbered as Code Section 42-1-9.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

42-1-8.
Home arrest program.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Educational program” means a program of learning recognized by the State Board of Education.

“Habilitative program” means and includes an alcohol or drug treatment program, mental health program, family counseling, community service, or any other community program ordered or approved by the court having jurisdiction over the offender or by the sheriff.

“Home arrest” means an electronic monitoring of an offender at a residence approved and accepted by the court, the sheriff, or the director or administrator of the home arrest program.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 42-1-4, any person who is confined in a county jail (1) after conviction and sentencing, (2) pending completion of a presentencing report, or (3) after return for a violation of the terms of probation may, in the discretion of the sheriff and subject to the eligibility requirements set forth in subsection (d) of this Code section, be assigned to a home arrest program under supervision of the sheriff. If it appears to the court that an offender subject to its jurisdiction is a suitable candidate for a home arrest program, the court may, subject to the eligibility requirements of subsection (d) of this Code section, order the offender to a home arrest program. Further, the sheriff or the court may authorize the offender to participate in educational or other habilitative programs designed to supplement home arrest.

Whenever the sheriff assigns an offender to home arrest, the court which sentenced such offender or before which such offender’s case is pending shall be notified in writing by the sheriff or the director or administrator of the home arrest program to which the offender is assigned of the offender’s place of employment and the location of any educational or habilitative program in which the offender participates. The court, in its discretion, may revoke the authority for any offender to participate in home arrest, whether such offender was assigned to home arrest by the court or the sheriff. The sheriff or home arrest director or administrator may enter into an agreement to accept into the local home arrest program offenders who are sentenced to home arrest or who have met all home arrest standards.

In order to qualify for assignment to a home arrest program, an offender:

May not be subject to any outstanding warrants or orders from any other court or law enforcement agency;

Shall not have any criminal record or any history within the preceding five years of any assaultive offenses of an aggravated nature, including, but not limited to, aggravated assault; aggravated battery; rape; child molestation; robbery; trafficking or distribution of a controlled substance or marijuana; homicide by vehicle; felony bail-jumping; or escape; or

May not have any life-threatening illnesses or disabilities that would interfere with the ability to work on a regular schedule.

An offender’s employment under this Code section shall be with a legitimate, recognized, and established employer. An offender assigned to a home arrest program who, without proper authority, leaves his home or the work area to which he is assigned, who leaves or fails to attend an assigned educational or other rehabilitative program, or who leaves the vehicle or route of travel in going to or returning from his assigned place of work shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. If the offender leaves the county or the area of restriction, he may be found guilty of escape under Code Section 16-10-52. An offender who is found guilty of a misdemeanor under this subsection or of escape shall be ineligible for further participation in a home arrest program during his current term of confinement.

Any wages earned by an offender in home arrest under this Code section may, upon order of the court or the sheriff, be paid to the director or administrator of the home arrest program after standard payroll deductions required by federal or state law have been withheld. Distribution of such wages shall be made for the following purposes:

To defray the cost of home arrest electronic monitoring equipment and supervision provided by the local jail or detention center, or to pay for any damage to the monitoring equipment in the offender’s possession or the failure to return the equipment to the program;

To pay travel and other such expenses of the offender necessitated by his home arrest employment or participation in an educational or rehabilitative program;

To provide support and maintenance for the offender’s dependents or to make payments to the local department of family and children services or probation, as appropriate, on behalf of any offender’s dependents receiving public assistance;

To pay any fines, restitution, or other costs ordered by the court; and

Any balance remaining after payment of costs and expenses listed in paragraphs (1) through (4) of this subsection shall be retained to the credit of the offender and shall be paid to him upon release from confinement.

No offender participating in home arrest pursuant to this Code section shall be deemed to be an agent, employee, or involuntary servant of the county while working or participating in educational or other habilitative programs or while traveling to or from the place of employment.

Local jails shall qualify for compensation for costs of incarceration of all persons pursuant to this Code section, less any payments from the offender pursuant to subsection (f) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-1-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1348, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 1991, p. 1319, § 1, Ga. L. 1991, p. 1348, § 1, and Ga. L. 1991, p. 1352, § 1, all purport to enact Code Section 42-1-7.
Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, Ga. L. 1991, p. 1348, § 1, has been renumbered as Code Section 42-1-8 and Ga. L. 1991, p. 1352, § 1, has been renumbered as Code Section 42-1-9.

Law reviews.

For note on 1991 enactment of this Code section, see 8 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 155 (1992).

42-1-9.
Work-release, educational, and habilitative programs for county prisoners.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Educational program” means a program of learning recognized by the State Board of Education.

“Habilitative program” means and includes an alcohol or drug treatment program, mental health program, family counseling, community service, or any other community program ordered or approved by the court having jurisdiction over the offender or by the sheriff.

“Work release” means full-time employment or participation in an acceptable and suitable vocational training program.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 42-1-4, any person who is confined in a county jail (1) after conviction and sentencing, (2) pending completion of a presentencing report, or (3) after return for a violation of the terms of probation may, in the discretion of the sheriff and subject to the eligibility requirements set forth in subsection (d) of this Code section, be assigned to a work-release program under supervision of the sheriff. If it appears to the court that an offender subject to its jurisdiction is a suitable candidate for a work-release program, the court may, subject to the eligibility requirements of subsection (d) of this Code section, order the offender to a work-release program. Further, the sheriff or the court may authorize the offender inmate to participate in educational or other habilitative programs designed to supplement work release.

Whenever the sheriff assigns an inmate to work release, the court which sentenced such offender or before which such offender’s case is pending shall be notified in writing by the sheriff or the director or administrator of the work-release program to which the offender is assigned of the offender’s place of employment and the location of any educational or habilitative program in which the offender participates. The court, in its discretion, may revoke the authority for any inmate to participate in work release, whether such inmate was assigned to work release by the court or the sheriff. The sheriff or work-release director or administrator may enter into an agreement to accept into the local work-release program inmates who are sentenced to work release or who have met all work-release standards.

In order to qualify for assignment to a work-release program, an offender:

May not be subject to any outstanding warrants or orders from any other court or law enforcement agency;

Shall not have any criminal record or any history within the preceding five years of any assaultive offenses of an aggravated nature, including, but not limited to, aggravated assault; aggravated battery; rape; child molestation; robbery; trafficking or distribution of a controlled substance or marijuana; homicide by vehicle; felony bail-jumping; or escape; or

May not have any life-threatening illnesses or disabilities that would interfere with the ability to work on a regular schedule.

An inmate’s employment under this Code section shall be with a legitimate, recognized, and established employer. An inmate assigned to a work-release program who, without proper authority, leaves the work area or site to which he is assigned, who leaves or fails to attend an assigned educational or other rehabilitative program, or who leaves the vehicle or route of travel in going to or returning from his assigned place of work shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. An offender who is found guilty of misdemeanor escape in accordance with this subsection shall be ineligible for further participation during his current term of confinement.

Any wages earned by an inmate in work release under this Code section may, upon order of the court or the sheriff, be paid to the director or administrator of the work-release program after standard payroll deductions required by federal or state law have been withheld. Distribution of such wages shall be made for the following purposes:

To defray the cost of the inmate’s keep, confinement, and supervision, which sums shall be paid into the general treasury;

To pay travel and other such expenses of the inmate necessitated by his work-release employment or participation in an educational or rehabilitative program;

To provide support and maintenance for the inmate’s dependents or to make payments to the local department of family and children services or probation, as appropriate, on behalf of any inmate’s dependents receiving public assistance;

To pay any fines, restitution, or other costs ordered by the court; and

Any balance remaining after payment of costs and expenses listed in paragraphs (1) through (4) of this subsection shall be retained to the credit of the inmate and shall be paid to him upon release from confinement.

No inmate participating in work release pursuant to this Code section shall be deemed to be an agent, employee, or involuntary servant of the county while working or participating in educational or other habilitative programs or while traveling to or from the place of employment.

Local jails shall qualify for compensation for costs of incarceration of all persons pursuant to this Code section, less any payments from the inmate pursuant to subsection (f) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-1-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1352, § 1.

Cross references.

Work-release programs for county prisoners, §

42-1-4

.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 1991, p. 1319, § 1, Ga. L. 1991, p. 1348, § 1, and Ga. L. 1991, p. 1352, § 1, all purport to enact Code Section 42-1-7.
Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, Ga. L. 1991, p. 1348, § 1, has been renumbered as Code Section 42-1-8 and Ga. L. 1991, p. 1352, § 1, has been renumbered as Code Section 42-1-9.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1991, “work-release program” was substituted for “work release program” in three places in subsection (b), twice in subsection (c), in subsections (d) and (e), in the introductory language of subsection (f), and in paragraph (f)(2); and “work-release” was substituted for “work release” preceding “director” and “standards” in subsection (c).

Administrative rules and regulations.

Work Standards, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Boards of Corrections, Institutional and Center Operations, Chapter 125-3-5.

Law reviews.

For note on 1991 enactment of this Code section, see 8 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 155 (1992).

42-1-10.
Preliminary urine screen drug tests.

Any community supervision officer of the Department of Community Supervision or official or employee of the Department of Corrections who supervises any person covered under the provisions of paragraphs (1) through (7) of this subsection shall be exempt from the provisions of Chapter 22 of Title 31 for the limited purposes of administering a preliminary urine screen drug test to any person who is:

Incarcerated;

Released as a condition of probation for a felony or misdemeanor;

Released as a condition of conditional release;

Released as a condition of parole;

Released as a condition of provisional release;

Released as a condition of pretrial release; or

Released as a condition of control release.

The Department of Corrections, Department of Community Supervision, and the State Board of Pardons and Paroles shall develop a procedure for the performance of preliminary urine screen drug tests in accordance with the manufacturer’s standards for certification. Community supervision officers of the Department of Community Supervision or officials or employees of the Department of Corrections who are supervisors of any person covered under paragraphs (1) through (7) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be authorized to perform preliminary urine screen drug tests in accordance with such procedure. Such procedure shall include instructions as to a confirmatory test by a clinical laboratory certified by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services where necessary.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-1-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 3234, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-63/HB 310; Ga. L. 2021, p. 472, § 3/HB 93.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “community supervision officer of the Department of Community Supervision or” for “probation officer, parole officer, or other” near the beginning of the introductory paragraph of subsection (a); in subsection (b), inserted “, Department of Community Supervision,” near the beginning of the first sentence, and substituted “Community supervision officers of the Department of Community Supervision or” for “Probation officers, parole officers, or other” at the beginning of the second sentence. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted “test by a clinical laboratory certified by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services” for “test by a licensed clinical laboratory” in the middle of the third sentence of subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).